Tennessee, session 114, SB0335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-605(a)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(B)
(i) Was taken for the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification of the
defendant; or
(ii) Includes the unclothed intimate area of the individual or the individual
engaged in sexual activity, as defined in § 39-17-1002, and the person knew that
the photograph would include such content; or
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-605(d)(2), is amended by
adding the following new subdivisions:
(C) The photograph was taken using a camera or other recording device that
was hidden from plain view at the time of the offense; or
(D) There was more than one (1) victim of the offense.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-605, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(g) Prosecution for a violation of this section must commence as provided in title
40, chapter 2. Pursuant to § 40-2-103, the statute of limitations is tolled for any period
during which the defendant conceals the crime until such time at which the victim
discovers the crime.
SB0335
002024
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-601(8), is amended by deleting
the language "or a human trafficking offense" and substituting ", a human trafficking offense, or
unlawful photography".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-601, is amended by adding the
following new subdivision:
( ) "Unlawful photography victim" means a person who has been the victim of
the offense of unlawful photography, as defined in § 39-13-605;
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-602, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) Any domestic abuse victim, stalking victim, sexual assault victim, or unlawful
photography victim who has been subjected to, threatened with, or placed in fear of,
domestic abuse, stalking, sexual exploitation of a minor, sexual assault, a human
trafficking offense, or unlawful photography, may seek relief under this part by filing a
sworn petition alleging domestic abuse, stalking, sexual exploitation of a minor, sexual
assault, a human trafficking offense, or unlawful photography by the respondent.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-602(c), is amended by deleting
the language "or human trafficking offense" and substituting "human trafficking offense, or
unlawful photography".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-605(b), is amended by deleting
the language "or a human trafficking offense" wherever it appears and substituting "a human
trafficking offense, or unlawful photography".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-606(a), is amended by deleting
the language "or a human trafficking offense" wherever it appears and substituting "a human
trafficking offense, or unlawful photography".
- 2 - 002024

SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-613(a), is amended by
deleting the language "or a human trafficking offense" and substituting "a human trafficking
offense, or unlawful photography".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-617(a), is amended by
deleting the language "sexual assault victim," wherever it appears and substituting "sexual
assault victim, unlawful photography victim,".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-617(a)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the language "sexual assault," and substituting "sexual assault, unlawful photography,".
SECTION 13. This act is known and may be cited as the "Voyeurism Victims Act."
SECTION 14. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002024